trunk/incubator/sl-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="strmenj/e__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fotografij/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ah</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="začet/ek__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kom</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="konkurenčnost__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stanj/e__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="oglj/e__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="veljav/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fakultet/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ah</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="preprog/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zgoščevanj/e__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e/razširitev</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pes/ek__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="major__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="konkurenčnost"><i>konkurenčnost</i><par n="konkurenčnost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="prečkanje"><i>prečkanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="zamujanje"><i>zamujanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="odpuščanje"><i>odpuščanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="utemeljevanje"><i>utemeljevanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="računanje"><i>računanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="strmenje"><i>strmenj</i><par n="strmenj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="soočenje"><i>soočenj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="krompir"><i>krompir</i><par n="major__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="barvanje"><i>barvanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="zgoščevanje"><i>zgoščevanj</i><par n="zgoščevanj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="popek"><i>pop</i><par n="pes/ek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sporočanje"><i>sporočanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ponavljanje"><i>ponavljanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tisočletje"><i>tisočletj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="razkrinkanje"><i>razkrinkanj</i><par n="strmenj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dobavljanje"><i>dobavljanj</i><par n="strmenj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="nogavica"><i>nogavic</i><par n="preprog/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="testiranje"><i>testiranj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="urejevanje"><i>urejevanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="razpisovanje"><i>razpisovanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bivališče"><i>bivališč</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="osvajanje"><i>osvajanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="zrnje"><i>zrnj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="oglje"><i>oglj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fotografija"><i>fotografij</i><par n="fotografij/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fakulteta"><i>fakultet</i><par n="fakultet/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pesek"><i>pes</i><par n="pes/ek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="veljava"><i>veljav</i><par n="veljav/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pretrganje"><i>pretrganj</i><par n="strmenj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="stanje"><i>stanj</i><par n="stanj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="preproga"><i>preprog</i><par n="preprog/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="major"><i>major</i><par n="major__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bruhanje"><i>bruhanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="obtoževanje"><i>obtoževanj</i><par n="strmenj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="strinjanje"><i>strinjanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="pogovarjanje"><i>pogovarjanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="regulator"><i>regulator</i><par n="major__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="preraščanje"><i>preraščanj</i><par n="strmenj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="zasačenje"><i>zasačenj</i><par n="strmenj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="onemogočanje"><i>onemogočanj</i><par n="strmenj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="grozdje"><i>grozdj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="iniciativa"><i>iniciativ</i><par n="preprog/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="začetek"><i>začet</i><par n="začet/ek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dovoljevanje"><i>dovoljevanj</i><par n="strmenj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="neupoštevanje"><i>neupoštevanj</i><par n="strmenj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="servisiranje"><i>servisiranj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dvomišljenje"><i>dvomišljenj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="identifikator"><i>identifikator</i><par n="major__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skladiščenje"><i>skladiščenj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="zapestje"><i>zapestj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="priseljevanje"><i>priseljevanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vznemirjenje"><i>vznemirjenj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="rokovanje"><i>rokovanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vnašanje"><i>vnašanj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="znojenje"><i>znojenj</i><par n="oglj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="prestrukturiranje"><i>prestrukturiranj</i><par n="stanj/e__n_nt"/></e>
